Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-4,109
Put-and-take trout fishing; regulations; fees; exception.

The commission may: (1) Establish, by regulation, special public-use areas for put-and-take trout fishing, on state-owned land, (2) stock such special public-use areas with trout, and (3) impose fees for trout fishing on such areas which fees shall be based on the actual cost to the state of providing and stocking such areas, except that no such fees may be imposed within ten miles of any privately owned and stocked trout fishing area which is open to the general public and for which a charge is made for fishing when such privately owned area was established before the establishment of such area by the commission.

Laws 1959, c. 158, § 1, p. 589;

Laws 1967, c. 218, § 1, p. 592;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-425;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 219.